src/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON Acronym   !!= * __@CODE@__ divides the acros in the 3 types just mentioned.
DJ+Sem/Hum:DJ ACRONOUN ;
EKG+Sem/Dummytag:EKG ACRONOUN ;
HK+Sem/Org:HK ACRONOUN ;
KM+Sem/Measr:KM ACRONOUN ;
OL+Sem/Event:OL ACRONOUN ;
VM+Sem/Event:VM ACRONOUN ;
professor% II+MWE+Sem/Hum:professor% II ACRONOUN ;
BUP+Sem/Org:BUP ACRO_BERN ;
DAT+Sem/Org:DAT ACRO_BERN ;
DEL+Sem/Org:DEL ACRO_BERN ;
ETA+Sem/Org:ETA ACRO_ACCRA ;
MEGA+Sem/Org:MEGA ACRO_ACCRA ;
NAV+Sem/Org:NAV ACRO_BERN ;
NGU+Sem/Org:NGU ACRO ;
NINA+Sem/Org:NINA ACRO_ACCRA ;
NINA-NIKU+Sem/Org:NINA-NIKU ACRO_ACCRA ;
RAF+Sem/Org:RAF ACRO_BERN ;
SAS+Sem/Org:SAS ACRO_BERN ;
SISA+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:SISA ACRO_ACCRA ;             !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
SKUP+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:SKUP ACRO_BERN ;              !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
UEFA+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:UEFA ACRO_ACCRA ;           !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
UNIX+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:UNIX ACRO_LONDON ;          !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
ACTA+CmpNP/None+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:ACTA ACRO_ACCRA ; !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat 
ASVO+CmpNP/None+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:ASVO ACRO_ACCRA ; !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat 
BASIC+OLang/UND+Sem/Obj:BASIC ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
COOP+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:COOP ACRO_BERN ;            !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
EFTA+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:EFTA ACRO_ACCRA ;           !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
FIFA+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:FIFA ACRO_ACCRA ;           !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
IKEA+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:IKE^A ACRO_ACCRA ;          !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NIFU+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NIFU ACRO_ACCRA ;           !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
ODIN+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:ODIN ACRO_LONDON ;          !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
OPEC+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:OPEC ACRO_LONDON ;          !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
REMA+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:REMA ACRO_ACCRA ;           !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NetSam+Sem/Org:NetSam9 ACRO_LONDON ;
SUF+Sem/Org:SUF ACRO ;
UNEP+Sem/Org:UNEP ACRO_LONDON ;
YLE+Sem/Org:YLE ACRO_ACCRA ;
DUO+Sem/Dummytag:DUO ACRO_ACCRA ; !kursnavn
SÁM+Sem/Dummytag:SÁM ACRO_ACCRA ; !kursnavn
FI+Sem/Plc:FI ACRO_ACCRA ; !Finland
NOKUT+Sem/Org:NOKUT ACRO_LONDON ;
M9+Sem/Sur:M9 ACRO ; !LIA
guovdageaidnu_uit_%07%01+Sem/Sur:guovdageaidnu_uit_%07%01 ACRO ; !LIA
E2+Sem/Sur:E2 ACRO ; !LIA
ADHD+Sem/State-sick:ADHD ACRONOUN ;
ATSIC:ATSIC ACRO_LONDON ;
CERD+Sem/Dummytag:CERD ACRO_BERN ;
SALSEA+OLang/UND+Sem/Obj:SALSEA ACRO_ACCRA ;         !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
SANKS+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:SANKS ACRO_BERN ;            !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
SESAM+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:SESAM ACRO_LONDON ;          !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
SINTEF+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:SINTEF ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
SUFUR+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:SUFUR ACRO_LONDON ;          !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
ÁJA+CmpNP/None+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:ÁJA ACRO_ACCRA ;  !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
UNESCO+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:UNESCO ACRO_ACCRA ;       !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
UNGJOBB+OLang/UND+Sem/Obj:UNG^JOBB ACRO_BERN ;     !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
UNIKOM+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:UNIKOM ACRO_BERN ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
URBACT+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:URBACT ACRO_BERN ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
EXFACFON+OLang/UND+Sem/Obj:EXFACFON ACRO_BERN ;    !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
AIDS+CmpNP/None+OLang/UND+Sem/State-sick:AIDS ACRO_BERN ;  !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
COCOM+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:COCOM ACRO_BERN ;          !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
COMECON+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:COMECON ACRO_LONDON ;    !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
ECHAM+OLang/UND+Sem/Obj:ECHAM ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
EALÁT+OLang/UND+Sem/Obj:EALÁT ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
FORTRAN+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:FORTRAN ACRO_BERN ;      !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
ILIOS+OLang/UND+Sem/Obj:ILIOS ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
INTERREG+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:INTER^REG ACRO_BERN ;   !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
KRIPOS+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:KRI^POS ACRO_LONDON ;     !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NIFES+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NIFES ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NIFU-STEP+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NIFU-STEP ACRO_BERN ;  !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NIPIAA+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NIPIAA ACRO_ACCRA ;       !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NOPEF+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NOPEF ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NOPUS+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NOPUS ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NORAD+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NORAD ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NORUT+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NORUT ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
EBD+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:EBD ACRO_BERN ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
OAFIR+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:OAFIR ACRO_LONDON ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
RAIPON+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:RAIPON ACRO_LONDON ;      !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
MS-DOS+Sem/Tool-it:MS-DOS ACRO_BERN ;
NM+Sem/Event:NM ACRO ;
neahtta-tv+Sem/Org_Prod-vis:neahtta-tv ACRONOUN ;
govdafierpmádat-tv+Sem/Org_Prod-vis:govda#fierpmádat-tv ACRONOUN ;
PC+Sem/Tool-it:PC ACRONOUN ;
sámi-tv+Sem/Org_Prod-vis:sámi-tv ACRONOUN ;
DOS+Sem/Tool-it:DOS ACRO_BERN ;
UNICODE+Sem/Tool-it:UNICODE ACRO_ACCRA ;
juovla-CD+Sem/Obj-el:juovla-CD ACRONOUN ;
oahppo-cd+Sem/Obj-el:oahppo-cd ACRONOUN ;
juovla-cd+Sem/Obj-el:juovla-cd ACRONOUN ;
sálbma-cd+Sem/Obj-el:sálbma-cd ACRONOUN ;
smj+Sem/Dummytag:smj ACRONOUN ;
nob+Sem/Dummytag:nob9 ACRONOUN ;
fst+Sem/Dummytag:fst ACRONOUN ;
lexc+Sem/Dummytag:lexc ACRONOUN ;
GWAPA+Sem/Org:GWAPA ACRO_ACCRA ;
RSFSR+Sem/Org:RSFSR ACRO ;
AT+Sem/Org:AT ACRO ;
DAN+Sem/Org:DAN ACRO ;
ENA+Sem/Org:ENA ACRO ;
FUOM+Sem/Org:FUOM ACRO ;
FÁGA+Sem/Org:FÁGA ACRO_ACCRA ;
IBK+Sem/Org:IBK ACRO ;
JPD+Sem/Org:JPD ACRO ;
LEA+Sem/Org:LEA ACRO ;
NCS+Sem/Org:NCS ACRO ;
OH+Sem/Org:OH ACRO ;
RDA+Sem/Org:RDA ACRO ;
SDÁ+Sem/Org:SDÁ ACRO ;
SNPL+Sem/Org:SNPL ACRO ;
SÁL+Sem/Org:SÁL ACRO ;
UNG+Sem/Org:UNG ACRO_BERN ;
WWA+Sem/Org:WWA ACRO ;
LEXICON LETTERNUMBER   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains a list of letters and numbers
VK2+Sem/Txt:VK2 ACRO ;
P-2+Sem/Org_Prod-audio:P-2 ACRO ;
LEXICON smallacro   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains acros with small letters
HUM-fak+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:HUM-fak9 ACRO_BERN ;       !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
komvux+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:kom9#vux ACRO_BERN ;        !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
NoKTuRNL+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:NoKTuRNL ACRO_LONDON ;    !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
RiTø+OLang/NOB+Sem/Org:Ri^Tø ACRO_NYSTØ ;            !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
SATø+OLang/NOB+Sem/Org:SA^Tø ACRO_NYSTØ ;            !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
UiTø+OLang/NOB+Sem/Org:Ui^Tø ACRO_NYSTØ ;            !  - propername says  čállinrávvagat
mánáid-tv+v1+Sem/Org_Prod-vis:mánáid9-tv ACRONOUN ;
Bufdir+Sem/Org:Bufdir ACRO ;
xml+Sem/Tool-it:xml ACRONOUN ;
HFST+Sem/Tool-it:HFST ACRONOUN ;
TWOLC+Sem/Tool-it:TWOLC ACRONOUN ;
kVA+Sem/Measr:kVA UNIT ;
FeFo+Err/Orth+OLang/UND+Sem/Org:Fefo ACRO_ACCRA ;
KoKS+Sem/Dummytag:KoKS ACRO ;
PhD+Sem/Txt:PHD ACRONOUN ;
GWh+Sem/Measr:GWh UNIT ;
Kbh+Sem/Measr:Kbh UNIT ;
Rg+Sem/Dummytag:Rg UNIT ;
alii+Sem/Dummytag:alii UNIT ;
borg+Sem/Time:borg9 UNIT ;
cm+Sem/Measr:cm UNIT ; !
cot+Sem/Dummytag:cot UNIT ; !
dg+Sem/Dummytag:dg UNIT ; !
dm+Sem/Substnc:dm9 UNIT ; !desimehtar
duor+Sem/Time:duor UNIT ; !Duorastat
golg+Sem/Time:golg9 UNIT ; !
hl+Sem/Measr:hl UNIT ; !
iežaskap+Use/-Spell+Sem/Dummytag:iežaskap9 UNIT ;
juov+Sem/Time:juov UNIT ;
kWh+Sem/Measr:kWh UNIT ;
km3+Sem/Measr:km3 UNIT ;
lc+Sem/Dummytag:lc UNIT ;
m/s+Sem/Measr:m/s UNIT ;
mW+Sem/Measr:mW UNIT ;
mm+Sem/Measr:mm UNIT ;
mm³+Sem/Measr:mm³ UNIT ;
m³+Sem/Measr:m³ UNIT ;
ps+Sem/Txt:ps UNIT ;
suoi+Sem/Time:suoi UNIT ; !Suoidnemánnu
